District of Columbia statutes.
4-638

Rules.

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter.

History

Aug. 16, 2008, D.C. Law 17-219, § 5048, 55 DCR 7598